Louisiana, session 2026, HB146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1300.27 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1300.27. Sports wagering; local option election; Sabine Parish
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing
authority of Sabine Parish is hereby authorized to call and conduct an election on a
proposition to allow the operation of sports wagering within that parish.
B.(1) The governing authority of Sabine Parish may call, by ordinance or
resolution, an election on the proposition of whether the operation of sports
wagering, as authorized by Chapter 10 of Title 27 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes
of 1950, shall be permitted within that parish.
(2) The ordinance or resolution shall specify the date of the election and the
wording of the proposition to appear on the ballot.
C.(1) An election called as provided by this Section may be held on any date
as provided by R.S. 18:402(F), provided it falls more than forty-five days but not
more than six months after the meeting at which the resolution or ordinance calling
the election is adopted.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-403 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 146
(2) Except as provided in this Section, the election shall be held in
accordance with the provisions of the Louisiana Election Code governing proposition
elections. Any elector who was qualified to vote in the election may demand a
recount of the ballots or contest the election in the manner and within the time
provided by law for recount or contest of elections in accordance with the Louisiana
Election Code.
D.(1) If a majority of the electors voting in the election authorized pursuant
to the provisions of this Section vote to permit the operation of sports wagering, then
sports wagering may be conducted in Sabine Parish as provided by law.
(2) If a majority of the electors voting in an election authorized pursuant to
the provisions of this Section vote not to permit the operation of sports wagering in
Sabine Parish, then no sports wagering shall be conducted in Sabine Parish.
E. The governing authority of Sabine Parish shall promptly notify the
Louisiana Gaming Control Board of the results of the election.
F. The cost of the election provided for by this Section shall be borne by the
governing authority of Sabine Parish.
G. The election pursuant to this Section shall take place only once.